Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington state tax policy should not be used to target or punish particular individuals, businesses, or entities. Rather, the legislature intends that Washington state tax policy should only provide for common welfare. The legislature finds that this is especially true when it could be perceived that any sole individual, business, or entity being taxed is being targeted or punished because of any political position, speech, or other constitutionally protected activity of the individual, business, entity, or group of individuals affiliated with the business or entity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) An excise tax levied under this title may not be assessed after the effective date of this section if the tax has the intent to or the effect of applying to a singular individual, business, or entity, or if the tax applies only to a group of individuals affiliated with a singular business or entity.(2) For purposes of this section, "business" means any business entity, including a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Section 2 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.--- END ---